src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/mrj1933-test-N-port_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - пӧрт: # Noun 'house'
     пӧрт+N+Sg+Nom: пӧрт
     пӧрт+N+Sg+Gen: пӧртӹн
     пӧрт+N+Sg+Dat: пӧртлан
     пӧрт+N+Sg+Acc: пӧртӹм
     пӧрт+N+Sg+Lat: пӧртэш
     пӧрт+N+Sg+Ill: пӧртӹшкӹ
     пӧрт+N+Sg+Ine: пӧртӹштӹ
     пӧрт+N+Sg+Com: пӧрткэ
     пӧрт+N+Sg+Abe: пӧрттэ
     пӧрт+N+Sg+Cmp: пӧртла
     пӧрт+N+Pl+Nom: пӧртвлӓ
     пӧрт+N+Pl+Gen: пӧртвлӓн
     пӧрт+N+Pl+Dat: пӧртвлӓлӓн
     пӧрт+N+Pl+Acc: пӧртвлӓм
     пӧрт+N+Pl+Lat: пӧртвлӓш
     пӧрт+N+Pl+Ill: пӧртвлӓшкӹ
     пӧрт+N+Pl+Ine: пӧртвлӓштӹ
     пӧрт+N+Pl+Com: пӧртвлӓге
     пӧрт+N+Pl+Abe: пӧртвлӓде
     пӧрт+N+Pl+Cmp: пӧртвлӓлӓ

#пӧртт, пӧртэт, пӧртэтшӹ, 
#пӧртжӹ, 
###
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: пӧртэм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Gen: пӧртэмӹн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Dat: пӧртэмлӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Acc: пӧртэмӹм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Lat: пӧртэшэм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Ill: пӧртшкэм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Ine: пӧртштэм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Com: пӧртэмгэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Abe: пӧртэмтэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg1+Cmp: пӧртэмлӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Nom: пӧртвлӓэм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Gen: пӧртвлӓэмӹн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Dat: пӧртвлӓэмлӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Acc: пӧртвлӓэмӹм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Lat: пӧртвлӓэшэм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ill: пӧртвлӓшкэм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Ine: пӧртвлӓштэм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Com: пӧртвлӓэмгэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Abe: пӧртвлӓэмтэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg1+Cmp: пӧртвлӓэмлӓ

###
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: пӧртэт
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Gen: пӧртэдӹн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Dat: пӧртэтлӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Acc: пӧртэдӹм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Lat: пӧртэшэт
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Ill: пӧртшкэт
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Ine: пӧртштэт
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Com: пӧртэткэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Abe: пӧртэттэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg2+Cmp: пӧртэтлӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Nom: пӧртвлӓэт
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Gen: пӧртвлӓэдӹн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Dat: пӧртвлӓэтлӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Acc: пӧртвлӓэдӹм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Lat: пӧртвлӓэшэт
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ill: пӧртвлӓшкэт
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Ine: пӧртвлӓштэт
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Com: пӧртвлӓэткэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Abe: пӧртвлӓэттэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg2+Cmp: пӧртвлӓэтлӓ
###
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: пӧртшӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Gen: пӧртшӹн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Dat: пӧртшӹлӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Acc: пӧртшӹм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Lat: пӧртэшӹжӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Ill: пӧртшкӹжӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Ine: пӧртштӹжӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Com: пӧртшӹгэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Abe: пӧртшӹтэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxSg3+Cmp: пӧртшӹлӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Nom: пӧртвлӓжӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Gen: пӧртвлӓӹн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Dat: пӧртвлӓжӹлӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Acc: пӧртвлӓэдӹм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Lat: пӧртвлӓэшӹжӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ill: пӧртвлӓшкӹжӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Ine: пӧртвлӓштӹжӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Com: пӧртвлӓжӹгэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Abe: пӧртвлӓжӹтэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxSg3+Cmp: пӧртвлӓжӹлӓ
###
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: пӧртна
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Gen: пӧртнан
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Dat: пӧртналан
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Acc: пӧртнам
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Lat: пӧртэшнӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Ill: пӧртшкына
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Ine: пӧртштына
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Com: пӧртнагэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Abe: пӧртнатэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl1+Cmp: пӧртнала
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Nom: пӧртвлӓнӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Gen: пӧртвлӓнӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Dat: пӧртвлӓнӓлӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Acc: пӧртвлӓнӓм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Lat: пӧртвлӓэшнӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Ill: пӧртвлӓшкӹнӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Ine: пӧртвлӓштӹнӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Com: пӧртвлӓнӓгэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Abe: пӧртвлӓнӓтэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl1+Cmp: пӧртвлӓнӓлӓ

###
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: пӧртда
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Gen: пӧртдан
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Dat: пӧртдалан
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Acc: пӧртдам
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Lat: пӧртэштӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Ill: пӧртшкыда
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Ine: пӧртштыда
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Com: пӧртдагэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Abe: пӧртдатэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl2+Cmp: пӧртдалӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Nom: пӧртвлӓдӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Gen: пӧртвлӓдӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Dat: пӧртвлӓдӓлӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Acc: пӧртвлӓдӓм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Lat: пӧртвлӓэштӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Ill: пӧртвлӓшкӹдӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Ine: пӧртвлӓштӹдӓ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Com: пӧртвлӓдӓгэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Abe: пӧртвлӓдӓтэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl2+Cmp: пӧртвлӓдӓлӓ
###
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: пӧртшты
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Gen: пӧртштын
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Dat: пӧртштылӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Acc: пӧртштым
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Lat: пӧртэшӹштӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Ill: пӧртшкышты
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Ine: пӧртштышты
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Com: пӧртштыгэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Abe: пӧртштытэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Sg+PxPl3+Cmp: пӧртштыла
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Nom: пӧртвлӓштӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Gen: пӧртвлӓштӹн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Dat: пӧртвлӓштӹлӓн
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Acc: пӧртвлӓштӹм
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Lat: пӧртвлӓэшӹштӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Ill: пӧртвлӓшкӹштӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Ine: пӧртвлӓштӹштӹ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Com: пӧртвлӓштӹгэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Abe: пӧртвлӓштӹтэ
     пӧрт+Orth/1933+N+Pl+PxPl3+Cmp: пӧртвлӓштӹлӓ
